Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.080

Statutes of limitations tolled until dispute resolution process concluded.

Any applicable statute of limitations shall be tolled as to participants in dispute resolution at a center established under this chapter during the period which begins with the date of the participants' execution of the written agreement required by RCW 7.75.040(1)(a) and ends on the date that a written agreement at the conclusion of the dispute resolution process is executed under RCW 7.75.040(1)(b) or a participant's written notice of withdrawal from the dispute resolution process is executed under RCW 7.75.060.

[ 1984 c 258 s 508.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.